Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.175, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Dog parks in restaurants and breweries. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a restaurant or brewery may establish a dog park on the premises of the restaurant or brewery. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 157.175, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Minimum requirements. The ordinance must include such regulations and limitations as the local government deems reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of the public, but must require, at a minimum, the following requirements, which must be clearly printed on a sign or signs posted on premises in a manner and place that are conspicuous to employees and patrons: (1) employees must be prohibited from touching, petting, or otherwise handling dogs; (2) employees and patrons must not allow dogs to come into contact with serving dishes, utensils, tableware, linens, paper products, or any other items involved in food service operations; (3) patrons must keep their dogs on a leash at all times and must keep their dogs under reasonable controlnew text begin , except patrons may allow their dogs to go off leash in a dog park established under subdivision 1anew text end ; (4) dogs must not be allowed on chairs, tables, or other furnishings; and (5) dog waste must be cleaned immediately and the area sanitized.